Illinois, session 104th, SB600.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The 9-8-8 Suicide and Crisis Lifeline Workgroup 5Act is amended by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (405 ILCS 150/1)7    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2025)8    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 9-8-8 9Suicide and Crisis Lifeline Workgroup Act.10(Source: P.A. 103-105, eff. 6-27-23.)